Florida, session 2026, SB160.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSection 624.3153, Florida Statutes, is created 16 to read: 17 624.3153âEmergency Residential Property Insurance 18 Assistance Trust Fund.â 19 (1)âThere is created within the Department of Financial 20 Services the Emergency Residential Property Insurance Assistance 21 Trust Fund to provide financial assistance to homeowners who can 22 demonstrate financial need or an inability to pay their 23 homeownersâ insurance due to rate increases. A homeowner who has 24 a total annual household income that does not exceed $250,000 25 before taxes is eligible for financial assistance from the trust 26 fund. 27 (2)âThe trust fund shall consist of $500 million drawn from 28 unallocated general revenue. 29 (3)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that, until 30 permanent solutions can be provided to prevent the displacement 31 of Florida homeowners, the trust fund shall serve as a temporary 32 source of financial relief to help ensure housing stability. 33 (4)âThe department shall administer the trust fund. 34 (5)âIn accordance with s. 19(f)(2), Art. III of the State 35 Constitution, the trust fund shall, unless terminated sooner, be 36 terminated on July 1, 2030. Before its scheduled termination, 37 the trust fund shall be reviewed as provided in s. 215.3206(1). 38 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.